Arkansas, session 2025, SB205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-202(g), concerning a student's ability
to transfer to another school district, is amended to read as follows:
(g) This section shall not be construed to restrict a student's
ability to:
(1) Participate in a tuition agreement with a nonresident school
district;
(2) Officially transfer to another a nonresident school district
or another public school within a resident or nonresident school district
pursuant to the Public School Choice Act of 2015, § 6-18-1901 et seq.; or
(3) Attend school as an international exchange student placed
with a host family by an international student exchange visitor placement
organization under the International Student Exchange Visitor Placement
*TNL102*
03-05-2025 09:57:04 TNL102

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB205
Organization Registration Act, § 6-18-1701 et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-18-227(b)(1) and (2)(A), concerning the
eligibility requirements to participate in the public school choice program
under the Arkansas Opportunity Public School Choice Act, are amended to read
as follows:
(b)(1) Upon the request of a parent, guardian, or student, if the
student is eighteen (18) years of age or older, a student may transfer from
his or her resident district or public school to another a nonresident school
district or another public school within his or her resident school district
under this section if, at the time of the request under this subdivision
(b)(1):
(A) Either:
(i) The resident public school district has been
classified by the state board as a public school district in need of Level 5
— Intensive support under § 6-15-2913 or § 6-15-2915; or
(ii) The resident public school in which he or she
is enrolled has a rating of “F” under §§ 6-15-2105 and 6-15-2106 and state
board rules, as allowed in subdivision (b)(3)(B)(i)(b) of this section; and
(B) Except as provided in subsection (n) of this section,
the parent, guardian, or student, if the student is eighteen (18) years of
age or older, has notified both the resident and nonresident school
districts, if applicable, of the request for a transfer no earlier than
January 1 and no later than May 1 of the school year before the school year
in which the student intends to transfer.
(2)(A)(i) For the purposes of continuity of educational choice,
a transfer under this section shall operate as an irrevocable election for
each subsequent entire school year and shall remain in force until the
student completes high school or the parent, guardian, or student, if the
student is eighteen (18) years of age or older, timely makes application
under a provision of law governing attendance in or transfer to another
public school within the student's resident school district or a nonresident
school district other than the student's assigned school or resident
district.
(ii)(a) Except as provided in subsection (n)
of this section, a transfer under this section is effective at the beginning
03-05-2025 09:57:04 TNL102

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB205
of the next academic year.
(b) A transfer of a student eligible under
subsection (n) of this section is effective immediately upon the nonresident
district's or other public school within the student's resident school
district's written notification of an acceptance.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-18-227(g), concerning the acceptance of a
transferring student's credits toward graduation under the Arkansas
Opportunity Public School Choice Act, is amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) A receiving district and a public school within a student's
resident school district that accepts a transferring student shall accept
credits toward graduation that were awarded by another public school district
or public school.
(2) The receiving district or public school within a student's
resident school district that accepts a transferring student shall award a
diploma to a nonresident student who transfers to the receiving district or
public school if the student meets the receiving district's or public
school's graduation requirements.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-18-227(i), concerning excused absences of
students under the Arkansas Opportunity Public School Choice Act, is amended
to read as follows:
(i)(1) Unless excused by the receiving school district or public
school for illness or other good cause:
(A) Any student participating in the opportunity public
school choice option shall:
(i) Remain in attendance throughout the school year;
and
(ii) Comply fully with the school's code of conduct;
and
(B) The parent or guardian of each student participating
in the opportunity public school choice option shall comply fully with the
receiving public school's or school district's parental involvement
requirements.
(2) A participant who fails to comply with this section shall
forfeit the opportunity public school choice option.
03-05-2025 09:57:04 TNL102

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB205

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1901(b)(3), concerning legislative
findings under the Public School Choice Act of 2015, is amended to read as
follows:
(3) These benefits of enhanced quality and effectiveness in our
public schools justify permitting a student to apply for admission to a
school in any resident or nonresident school district beyond the school
district in which the student resides, provided that the transfer by the
student does not conflict with an enforceable judicial decree or court order
remedying the effects of past racial segregation in the resident school
district or nonresident school district.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1903(a), concerning the establishment
of a public school choice program under the Public School Choice Act of 2015,
is amended to read as follows:
(a) A public school choice program is established to enable a student
in kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) to attend a school in a
nonresident district or another public school within a resident district,
subject to the limitations under § 6-18-1906.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1903(e), concerning the transfer of
credits toward graduation and upon a transfer under the Public School Choice
Act of 2015, is amended to read as follows:
(e) A nonresident district or another public school within a resident
district shall:
(1) Accept credits toward graduation that were awarded by
another district or public school within a resident district; and
(2) Award a diploma to a nonresident student who transfers under
this subchapter if the student meets the public school's or nonresident
district's graduation requirements.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1904(b)-(f), concerning requirements
of students who transfer school districts or schools under the Public School
Choice Act of 2015, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) A student may accept only one (1) school choice transfer per
school year.
03-05-2025 09:57:04 TNL102

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB205
(2)(A) A student who accepts a public school choice transfer may
return to his or her resident district or the public school within his or her
resident district from which he or she transferred during the school year.
(B) If a transfer student returns to his or her resident
district or the public school within his or her resident district from which
he or she transferred or enrolls in a private or home school, the student's
transfer is voided, and the student shall reapply if the student seeks a
future school choice transfer.
(c)(1) A transfer student attending a nonresident school or another
public school within his or her resident district under this subchapter may
complete all remaining school years at the nonresident district.
(2) A present or future sibling of a student who continues
enrollment in the nonresident district or another public school within his or
her resident district under this subsection and applies for a school choice
transfer under § 6-18-1905 may enroll in the nonresident district or other
public school within his or her resident district if the district or public
school has the capacity to accept the sibling without adding teachers, staff,
or classrooms or exceeding the regulations, rules, or standards established
by law.
(3) A present or future sibling of a student who continues
enrollment in the nonresident district or another public school within his or
her resident district and who enrolls in the nonresident district or other
public school within his or her resident district under subdivision (c)(2) of
this section may complete all remaining school years at the nonresident
district or other public school within his or her resident district.
(d)(1) The transfer student or the transfer student's parent is
responsible for the transportation of the transfer student to and from the
school in the nonresident district where the transfer student is enrolled.
(2) The In the event a student transfers to a nonresident
district under this subchapter, the nonresident district may enter into a
written agreement with the student, the student's parent, or the transfer
student's resident district to provide the transportation.
(e) For purposes of determining a school district's state aid, a
transfer student is counted as a part of the average daily membership of the
nonresident district where the transfer student is enrolled if a student
transfers to a nonresident district under this subchapter.
03-05-2025 09:57:04 TNL102

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB205
(f)(1) A student who transfers to another public school within his or
her resident district or a nonresident district under this subchapter shall
not be:
(A) Denied participation in an extracurricular activity at
the public school within his or her resident district or nonresident district
to which he or she transfers based exclusively on his or her decision to
transfer to the public school within his or her resident district or
nonresident district; or
(B) Disciplined in any manner based exclusively on the
exercise of his or her right to transfer to another public school within his
or her resident district or a nonresident district under this subchapter.
(2)(A) However, a student who transfers to another public school
within his or her resident district or a nonresident school district under
this subchapter shall complete a Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form
as defined by the Arkansas Activities Association.
(B) A Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form shall
be completed and filed with the:
(i) Public school within the transfer student's
resident district or nonresident school district to which the student
transfers under this section; and
(ii) Arkansas Activities Association.
(C)(i) Before a student is eligible to participate in an
extracurricular activity at the public school within his or her resident
district or nonresident school district to which he or she transfers, the
Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form submitted by the student as
required under subdivision (f)(2)(B) of this section shall be signed by the:
(a) Superintendent of the student's resident
school district;
(b) Superintendent of the nonresident school
district to which the student transfers, if the student transfers to a
nonresident district; and
(c) Parent, legal guardian, or person standing
in loco parentis to the student.
(ii) The superintendent of a student's resident
school district and the superintendent of the nonresident school district to
which a student transfers, or the superintendent of the student's resident
03-05-2025 09:57:04 TNL102

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB205
district if the student is transferring schools within his or her resident
district, shall sign the Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form unless
there is demonstrable evidence:
(a) Of recruiting by the receiving school
district or receiving school personnel; or
(b) The student is transferring to the public
school within his or her resident district or the nonresident school district
solely for athletic purposes.
(D) A Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form shall
be used only for eligibility determination of a student who transfers to
another public school within his or her resident district or nonresident
school district under this subchapter and is enrolled in the receiving school
district by July 1 before the student enters grades seven through twelve (7-
12).
(E)(i) Public school district personnel and registered
volunteers, as defined by the Arkansas Registered Volunteers Program Act, §
6-22-101 et seq., shall not recruit students to the public school at which
they are employed or volunteer for athletic purposes.
(ii) As used in this section, “recruiting” means the
use of undue influence or special inducement by an individual who is
connected directly or indirectly with a school that is a member of the
Arkansas Activities Association in an attempt to encourage, induce, pressure,
urge, or entice a prospective student of any age to transfer to the school or
retain a student at the school for the purpose of participating in
extracurricular activities.
(3) As used in subdivision (f)(1) of this section,
“extracurricular activity” means an interschool activity not included in a
regular curriculum, including without limitation sports and special interest
clubs or groups.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1905 is amended to read as follows:
6-18-1905. Application for transfer.
(a)(1) An application under this section shall be accepted no earlier
than January 1 and no later than May 1 each year.
(2)(A) Each school district shall have a policy stating the
method by which a parent or guardian of a student, or a student who is
03-05-2025 09:57:04 TNL102

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB205
eighteen (18) years of age or older, may submit a school choice application,
including without limitation:
(i) Regular mail;
(ii) Email; and
(iii) Hand delivery.
(B) A public school district shall not require in-person
filing of an application.
(3) If a student seeks to attend a school in a nonresident
district or another school within his or her resident district, the student's
parent or guardian, or a student who is eighteen (18) years of age or older,
shall submit an application:
(A) To the nonresident district and to the student's
resident district, or only to the student's resident district if the student
is applying to transfer to another public school within his or her resident
district;
(B) On a form approved by the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education; and
(C) Postmarked or delivered no later than May 1 of the
year in which the student seeks to begin the fall semester at the nonresident
district or another public school within the student's resident district,
except as otherwise provided for dependents of uniformed service members and
uniformed service veterans under this subchapter.
(b) Both the nonresident district and the resident district, or only
the resident district if a student applies to transfer to another public
school within his or her resident district, shall, upon receipt of the
application submitted under subsection (a) of this section, place a date and
time stamp on the application that reflects the date and time each the
nonresident district or the resident district if a student applies to
transfer to another public school within his or her resident district
received the application.
(c) A nonresident district or a resident district if a student applied
to transfer to another public school within his or her resident district
shall review and make a determination on each application in the order in
which the application was received by the nonresident district or the
resident district if a student applied to transfer to another public school
within his or her resident district.
03-05-2025 09:57:04 TNL102

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB205
(d) Before accepting or rejecting an application, a nonresident
district or a resident district if a student applied to transfer to another
public school within his or her resident district shall determine whether the
limitation under § 6-18-1906 applies to the application.
(e)(1) By July 1 of the school year in which a student seeks to enroll
in a nonresident district or a resident district if the student seeks to
enroll in another public school within his or her resident district under
this subchapter, the superintendent of the nonresident district or the
superintendent of the resident district if the student applies to transfer to
another public school within his or her resident district shall notify the
student's parent or guardian and the resident district, if applicable, in
writing as to whether the student's application has been accepted or
rejected.
(2) If an application is rejected, the superintendent of the
nonresident district or the superintendent of the resident district if the
student applies to transfer to another public school within his or her
resident district shall state in the notification letter the reason for
rejection.
(3) If an application is accepted, the superintendent of the
nonresident district or the superintendent of the resident district if the
student applied to transfer to another public school within his or her
resident district shall state in the notification letter a reasonable
deadline by which the student shall enroll in the nonresident district or the
resident district if the student applied to transfer to another public school
within his or her resident district and after which the acceptance
notification is null.
(4) [Repealed.]
(f)(1) For each application received under this section, the
nonresident district or the resident district if the student applied to
transfer to another public school within his or her resident district shall
notify the applicant in writing as to whether the student's application has
been accepted or rejected within fifteen (15) calendar days of the
nonresident district's or resident district's receipt of the application.
(2) A transfer of the student is effective immediately upon the
nonresident district's or resident district's written notification of an
acceptance.
03-05-2025 09:57:04 TNL102

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB205

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1907(b), concerning rules promulgated
by the State Board of Education under the Public School Choice Act of 2015,
is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) A student whose application for a transfer under § 6-18-1905 is
rejected by the a nonresident district or a resident district if the student
applied to transfer to another public school within his or her resident
district may request a hearing before the state board to reconsider the
transfer.
(2)(A) A request for a hearing before the state board under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be in writing and shall be
postmarked no later than ten (10) days after the student or the student's
parent receives a notice of rejection of the application under § 6-18-1905.
(B) As part of the review process, the student or the
student's parent may submit supporting documentation that the transfer would
be in the best educational, social, or psychological interest of the student.
(3) If the state board overturns the determination of the
nonresident district or the resident district if the student applied to
transfer to another public school within his or her resident district on
appeal, the state board shall notify the parent, the nonresident district, if
applicable, and the resident district of the basis for the state board's
decision.
(4) A student is not permitted to request a hearing before the
state board if his or her application for a transfer is rejected due to the
application's not being timely received by both the resident district and
nonresident district, if applicable.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1909(b), concerning eligibility for
dependents of uniformed service members and uniformed service veterans to
transfer schools or school districts under the Public School Choice Act of
2015, is amended to read as follows:
(b) If a student eligible under subsection (a) of this section seeks
to attend a school in a nonresident district or a different public school
within a resident district, the student's parent, legal guardian, or person
standing in loco parentis to the student shall submit an application approved
by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education by regular mail,
03-05-2025 09:57:04 TNL102

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB205
electronic mail, or in person to the student's nonresident district, if
applicable, and resident district, which includes:
(1) A copy of the identification card of the student's parent,
legal guardian, or person standing in loco parentis that qualifies the
student under this section; and
(2) A copy of the official orders, assignment notification, or
notice of mobilization of the student's parent, legal guardian, or person
standing in loco parentis.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1909(e), concerning transportation of
a student who is a dependent of a uniformed service member or a uniformed
service veteran under the Public School Choice Act of 2015, is amended to
read as follows:
(e) The parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to
a student eligible for a school transfer under this section shall be
responsible for the transportation of his or her child to and from a
nonresident district if the student transferred to a nonresident district.

/s/A. Clark

















03-05-2025 09:57:04 TNL102